Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Alternative Energy Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 45.88.010.
Fund established.

There is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development the alternative energy conservation revolving loan fund to carry out the purposes of AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

. Loans made under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

are to be used

to develop means of energy production utilizing one or more alternative energy systems; and

to purchase, construct, and install energy conservation improvements in commercial buildings.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 83 SLA 2010.]

Notwithstanding any other provision in AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

, a multifuel heating system that uses the combination of wood or fossil fuel for fuel does qualify under this loan fund.

The alternative energy conservation revolving loan fund consists of

money appropriated to the fund by the legislature;

gifts, bequests, or contributions from other sources;

principal and interest payments or other income earned on loans or investments in the fund; and

money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other processes on loans made under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1978; am §§ 5, 8 ch 56 SLA 1979; am § 28 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 74 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 20, 21, 38 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was formerly AS 45.88.500(b).
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, rewrote (a); repealed (c); added (e).

Sec. 45.88.015.
Special account established.

There is established, as a special account within the revolving loan fund established under AS

45.88.010

, the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

45.88.020

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 23 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.88.020.
Powers and duties of the department in administering the fund.

The department may

make loans for the purchase, construction, and installation, in commercial buildings that are located in the state, of

alternative energy systems; and

energy conservation improvements;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided and charges for collecting the fees;

collect the fees and collection charges established under this subsection.

The department shall develop eligibility standards for loans made under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

and adopt guidelines for the determination of loan terms.

The department may not make a loan under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1978; am §§ 6, 8 ch 56 SLA 1979; am § 29 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 75 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 22 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error. In 2006, “AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For alternative energy loans, see 3 AAC 78.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (a)(1), added the (A) and (B) designations, added “, in commercial buildings that are located in the state,” following “make loans for the purchase, construction, and installation”, added (a)(1)(B), and made a related change.

Sec. 45.88.025.
Eligibility.

To be eligible for a loan under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

, an applicant must

physically reside in the state and maintain a domicile in the state during 12 consecutive months before the date of application for a loan and may not have

declared or established residency in another state; or

received residency or a benefit based on residency from another state;

be at least 51 percent owned by individuals described in (1) of this section if the applicant is a corporation, joint venture, or partnership; or

be a nonprofit organization under AS 10.20.

History.

(§ 23 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 23, ch. 83, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 14, 2010.

Sec. 45.88.030.
Loan terms.

A loan made under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

may not exceed $50,000. If the requested loan amount exceeds $30,000, the applicant must deliver to the department a document from a financial institution stating that

the applicant has been denied a loan for the same purpose; or

the loan from the financial institution is contingent on the applicant also receiving a loan from the fund.

The duration for repayment of the loan may not exceed 20 years.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 83 SLA 2010.]

[Repealed, § 38 ch 83 SLA 2010.]

The rate of interest for a loan under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

is the prime rate, as defined by AS

44.88.599

, plus one percentage point, but may not be less than five percent a year.

A loan under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

must be secured by a mortgage or other security instrument in the real property to be improved and a lien on the improvements financed with the loan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 56 SLA 1979; am § 21 ch 72 SLA 1979; am §§ 30 — 33 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 57, 58 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 19 ch 102 SLA 1983; am §§ 80, 81 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 76 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 24 — 26, 38 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Administrative Code. —

For alternative energy loans, see 3 AAC 78.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, repealed and reenacted (a); repealed (c); repealed (d); in (e), substituted “under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

is the prime rate, as defined by AS 45.88.599, plus one percentage point, but may not be less than five percent a year” for “for an alternative energy system is five percent for the first $15,000 of the loan and 15 percent for the amount of the loan that exceeds $15,000”; added (f).

Sec. 45.88.040.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes. [Repealed, § 38 ch 83 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 45.88.050.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

.
Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 24 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2006, “AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 45.88.090.
Definition.

In AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

,

“alternative energy system”

means a source of thermal, mechanical or electrical energy that is not dependent on oil or gas or a nuclear fuel for the supply of energy for space heating and cooling, refrigeration and cold storage, electrical power, mechanical power, or the heating of water;

includes

an alternative energy property as defined by 26 U.S.C. 48(a)(3)(A) (Sec. 301, P.L. 95-618, Internal Revenue Code);

a method of architectural design and construction that provides for the collection, storage, and use of direct radiation from the sun;

a woodstove that complies with the provisions of 40 C.F.R. 60.530;

a steam, hot water, or ducted hot air central heating system that uses wood or coal for fuel; and

a high efficiency wood pellet or grain stove;

does not include

a stove that uses only coal or oil for fuel; or

a fireplace or fireplace insert;

“commercial building”

means a building that is intended to be used for commercial purposes;

does not include

a residential structure or mobile home that contains one to four family housing units; or

individual units of condominiums or cooperatives;

“energy conservation improvement” means

structural insulation;

thermal windows and doors;

a furnace replacement burner designed to achieve a reduction in the amount of fuel consumed as a result of increased combustion efficiency;

a device for modifying flue openings designed to increase the efficiency of operation of the heating system;

an electrical or mechanical furnace ignition system that replaces a gas pilot light;

an automatic energy-saving setback thermostat;

a meter that displays the cost of energy usage;

caulking and weather-stripping of doors and windows;

insulating shades and shutters;

air and water recuperators.

[Renumbered as AS

45.88.010(d)

.]

History.

(§ 34 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 59, 60 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 79 SLA 1983; am § 20 ch 102 SLA 1983; am § 27 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.88.050

and renumbered as AS

45.88.500

in 1980. Renumbered again in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.090

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Paragraphs (a)(2)(D) and (a)(2)(E) were renumbered in 1983 as (a)(2)(C) and (a)(2)(D) respectively when former (a)(2)(C) was repealed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, rewrote (a).